Colorado, session 2026A, HB1191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-115, amend (1) as
follows:
2-3-115. Use of state education fund money for school capital
construction - audits - reports.
(1) For the 2001-02 school district budget year and each school
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

district budget year thereafter, for the purpose of determining the amount
of state education fund moneys MONEY expended by each school district in
the state for capital construction and identifying the schools and projects on
which school districts expended such moneys THE MONEY, the state auditor
shall annually MAY, AT THE STATE AUDITOR'S DISCRETION, examine the
records of each school district in the state that received state education fund
moneys MONEY for the budget year: YEAR
(a) Directly DIRECTLY from the department of education for capital
construction aid to qualified charter schools, as defined in section
22-54-124 (1)(f.6), C.R.S. in accordance with section 22-54-124 (4).
C.R.S.; or
(b) For budget years 2000-01 through 2006-07, indirectly from the
school capital construction expenditures reserve created in section
22-54-117 (1.5)(a)(I), C.R.S. as said reserve existed prior to July 1, 2008,
and for the budget year 2007-08, indirectly from the school capital
construction expenditures reserve fund, as said fund existed prior to July 1,
2008.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1191

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1191